Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.695, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Benefits and services. (a) Counties or groups of counties administering CARMA must cover all benefits and services required to be covered by medical assistance under section 256B.0625. (b) Counties or groups of counties administering CARMA may reimburse enrollees directly for out-of-pocket costs incurred obtaining assessed HRSN services provided by nontraditional providers who are unable to accept payment via traditional health insurance methods. Enrollees must not be reimbursed for out-of-pocket costs paid to providers eligible to enroll. new text begin (c) Any modification to the entity administering, or with primary control over the administration of, a benefit or service required to be covered by medical assistance does not apply to CARMA unless: new text end new text begin (1) the modification is expressly described in this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner has published the written estimate of local fiscal impacts described in paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (d) Any modification to the benefits or services required to be covered by medical assistance does not apply to CARMA unless: new text end new text begin (1) the modification is expressly described in this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner has published the written estimate of local fiscal impacts described in paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (e) Prior to the effective date of a modification described in paragraph (c) or (d), the commissioner must publish a written estimate of the local fiscal impacts to counties or groups of counties administering CARMA arising from the modification. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective on the effective date of Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 8, section 25. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.695, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Payment. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The commissioner, in consultation with counties and groups of counties administering CARMA, must develop a mechanism for making payments to counties and groups of counties that administer CARMA. The payment mechanism must: (1) be governed by contracts with terms, including but not limited to payment rates, amended on an as-needed basis; (2) pay a full-risk monthly capitation payment for services included in CARMA, including the cost for administering CARMA benefits and services; (3) include risk corridors based on minimum loss ratio, total cost of care, or other metrics; (4) include a settle-up process tied to the risk corridor arrangement allowing a county or group of counties administering CARMA to retain savings for reinvestment in health care activities and operations to protect against significant losses that a county or group of counties administering CARMA or the state might realize, beginning no sooner than after a county's or group of counties' third year of CARMA operations; (5) include a collaborative rate-setting process accounting for CARMA experience, regional experience, and the Department of Human Services fee-for-service experience; and (6) be exempt from section 256B.69, subdivisions 5a, paragraphs (c) and (f), and 5d, and payment for Medicaid services provided under section 256B.69, subdivision 28, paragraph (b), no sooner than three years after CARMA implementation. deleted text begin (b) Payments for benefits and services under subdivision 6, paragraph (a), must not exceed payments that otherwise would have been paid to health plans under medical assistance for that county or region. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective on the effective date of Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 8, section 25. new text end